District of Columbia statutes.
1-1102.01

Repealed

Political committees.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 449, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 201
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title VIII, § 803, 23 DCR 2050
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(r), 29 DCR 458
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
1973 Ed., § 1-1131.
1981 Ed., § 1-1411.